Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 2

Change of Venue

20-4-201. Cases in which venue changeable.

In all civil cases at law where the issue is to be tried by jury, and in all cases of issues in courts of equity directed to be tried by jury, either in the circuit or chancery court, in all civil cases before a judge of the court of general sessions, and in all criminal cases:

The venue may be changed, at any time before trial, upon good cause shown, as prescribed in this part; or

A court may issue an order for a special venire of jurors from another county if in its discretion it determines the action to be necessary to ensure a fair trial.

Code 1858, § 2835 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 49, § 17; 1815, ch. 166, § 8; 1841-1842, ch. 16, § 1); Acts 1870, ch. 5, § 1; Shan., § 4549; Code 1932, § 8682; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-501; Acts 1995, ch. 321, § 1.

Cross-References. Transfer of cases to new county, §5-2-108.

Transfer of causes in chancery, §16-11-201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 6.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Cited: Wilson v. State, 2 Tenn. Crim. App. 138, 452 S.W.2d 355, 1969 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 311 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1969); Woodson v. Porter Brown Limestone Co., 916 S.W.2d 896, 1996 Tenn. LEXIS 96 (Tenn. 1996).

20-4-202. One change for each side.

The venue may be changed by the plaintiff or defendant, or both, but not more than once by each, except for causes not in existence when the first change was taken.

Code 1858, § 2836 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 43, § 1); Acts 1870, ch. 5, § 2; Shan., § 4550; Code 1932, § 8683; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-502.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., 6.

20-4-203. Application for change.

The party applying for a change of venue shall make a statement of facts, in writing, under oath or affirmation, that the party verily believes that, owing to prejudice, or other causes then existing, the party cannot have a fair and impartial trial in the county, or before the general sessions judge, where the cause is pending, the truth of which statement shall, in a court of record, be verified and supported by the oath of at least three (3), and before a general sessions judge, of one (1) or more, respectable and disinterested persons.

Code 1858, § 2837 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 78, § 1); Acts 1870, ch. 5, § 3; Shan., § 4551; mod. Code 1932, § 8684; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-503.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 8.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Tennessee Gas Transmission Co. v. Oakley, 193 Tenn. 638, 249 S.W.2d 880, 1952 Tenn. LEXIS 334 (1952).

20-4-204. Allowance of change.

If the presiding judge, on due consideration, is of the opinion that the cause set forth is good, and the truth of the cause set forth is evident and credibly supported, the presiding judge shall allow the change asked for.

Code 1858, § 2838 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 78, § 1); Shan., § 4552; mod. Code 1932, § 8685; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-504.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

20-4-205. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-4-205 (Code 1858, § 2840 (deriv. Acts 1811, ch. 72, § 17); Shan., § 4554; Code 1932, § 8687; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-505), concerning time for application and change, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 538, § 1.

20-4-206. Court to which changed — Special venire.

The change of venue in a court of record shall be made to the nearest adjoining county free from the like exception, whether in the same judicial district or out of it.

Before a general sessions judge, it shall be made to the nearest judge of the court of general sessions of the same county free from like exceptions.

Upon an order for a special venire of jurors from a court other than the court of record, as authorized by § 20-4-201, the jury selection shall be made from the nearest adjoining county free from the like exception, whether in the same judicial district or out of it.

Code 1858, § 2839 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 49, § 17); Acts 1870, ch. 5, § 4; Shan., § 4553; Code 1932, § 8686; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-506; Acts 1995, ch. 321, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, 7.

20-4-207. Costs of change.

The party applying for a change of venue shall, in the cases referenced in this part, pay the cost of the transcript and transmission of paper; and, in the discretion of the court, the applicant may be required to give bond, or additional bond, for costs.

Code 1858, § 2841; Shan., § 4555; mod. Code 1932, § 8688; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-507.

Collateral References. Costs
155.

20-4-208. Incompetency of judge.

As a further provision to prevent delay in cases of incompetency, it is the duty of the circuit court judges and chancellors, whenever there is a cause before one (1) of them, in which the circuit court judge or chancellor is interested, at the request of the opposite party, to transfer the cause to any court in an adjoining district or division that the adverse party may choose; and the original papers, with a certified copy of all orders, shall be immediately transmitted to the court to which the venue is changed.

Where the judge of any court of law or chancery is incompetent, from any other cause, to try the cause, upon application of either of the parties to the suit, the suit shall be transferred to the nearest court having jurisdiction of such cases where like incompetency does not exist.

Code 1858, § 3924; Acts 1870, ch. 9, § 1; Shan., §§ 5720, 5721; mod. Code 1932, §§ 9906, 9907; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-508.

Cross-References. Disqualification of judge and grounds of incompetency, §17-2-101, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 11.

Special judge, §§17-2-109 —17-2-113.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 621.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 6.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Collateral References. 77 Am. Jur. 2d Venue § 61.

Affidavit or motion for disqualification of judge as contempt. 70 A.L.R.3d 797.

Disqualification of judge by state in criminal case for bias or prejudice. 68 A.L.R.3d 509.

Disqualification of judge for having decided different case against litigant — state cases. 85 A.L.R.5th 547.

Disqualification of judge for having decided different case against litigant. 21 A.L.R.3d 1369.

Disqualification of original trial judge to sit on retrial after reversal or mistrial. 60 A.L.R.3d 176.

Laws governing judicial recusal or disqualification in state proceeding as violating federal or state constitution. 91 A.L.R.5th 437.

Membership in fraternal or social club or order affected by a case as ground for disqualification of judge. 75 A.L.R.3d 1021.

Prior representation or activity as prosecuting attorney as disqualifying judge from sitting or acting in criminal case. 85 A.L.R.5th 471.

Venue
45.

20-4-209. Transmission of records.

When a change of venue is directed, the clerk of court shall make a transcript of all the minutes, orders and proceedings in the cause, duly certified, and envelope the transcript, together with all the original papers, in a strong wrapper, securely sealed and safely deliver or transmit the package by messenger, registered mail or express to the clerk of the court to which the venue has been changed.

Code 1858, § 2843; Shan., § 4557; mod. Code 1932, § 8690; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-509.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 8.

20-4-210. Expense of transmitting records.

The clerk or messenger delivering the packages will be entitled to five cents (5¢) a mile, going and returning, and tolls and ferriages, to be paid in advance by the party applying for the change of venue. If these expenses are paid by the opposing party, they will be taxed in the bill of costs against the opposing party's adversary.

Code 1858, § 2844; Shan., § 4558; Code 1932, § 8691; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-510.

Cross-References. Clerk's fees for transmittal of record, §8-21-401.

Collateral References. Costs
155.

20-4-211. Expenses relating to jury.

When a change of venue in any case, either civil or criminal, is ordered by the circuit or criminal courts of this state from one (1) county to another, the jury fees, in trying the case, shall be paid by the county from which the case is sent, and the fees of the officers summoning jurors in cases where the venue is changed shall be accordingly taxed and certified by the clerk in civil cases, and also by the judge and district attorney general in criminal cases, in the same manner as the fees are otherwise certified by law.

Acts 1889, ch. 201; Shan., § 4567; Code 1932, § 8692; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-511.

Collateral References. Costs
155.